Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-1951
Existing rules and regulations, licenses,
and proceedings; how treated.

(1) All rules and regulations adopted and promulgated prior
to May 26, 2013, under sections 71-1901 to 71-1906.01 or other statutes amended
by Laws 2013, LB265, may continue to be effective under the Children's Residential
Facilities and Placing Licensure Act to the extent not in conflict with the
act.

(2) All licenses
issued prior to May 26, 2013, in accordance with sections 71-1901 to 71-1906.01
or other statutes amended by Laws 2013, LB265, shall remain valid as issued
for purposes of the Children's Residential Facilities and Placing Licensure
Act unless revoked or otherwise terminated by law.

(3) Any suit, action,
or other proceeding, judicial or administrative, which was lawfully commenced
prior to May 26, 2013, under sections 71-1901 to 71-1906.01 or other statutes
amended by Laws 2013, LB265, shall be subject to the provisions of sections
71-1901 to 71-1906.01 or such other statutes as they existed prior to May
26, 2013.

Laws 2013, LB265, § 28.